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DTC P0 120/41 Throttle/PedalPositionSensor/Switch”A”
Circuit

DTC P0 122/41 Throttle/PedalPositionSensor/Switch”A”
Circuit Low Input

DTC P0 123/41 Throttle/PedalPositionSensor/Switch”A”
Circuit High Input

DTC P0220/4 1 Throttle/PedalPositionSensor/Switch”B”
Circuit

DTC P0222/4 1 Throttle/PedalPositionSensor/Switch”B”
Circuit Low Input

DTC P0223/4 1 Throttle/PedalPositionSensor/Switch”B”
Circuit High Input

DTC P2 135/41 Throttle/PedalPositionSensor/Switch
”A”/”B” Voltage Correction

HINT:
This is the purpose for the ”throttle position sensor”.
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UsableRange

Throttle Valve Opening Angle (deg)

84

7

0

5

2.60
2.25

0.97
0.69

Throttle Valve Fully Opened
(Throttle Position expressed as percentage
(VTA1)64 to96%)

FailSafeAngle7 ˚
(Throttle Position expressed as percentage
(VTA1)about 10 to24%)

Throttle Valve Fully Closed
(Throttle Position expressed as percentage
(VTA1) 10 to20%)

*1:

VTA1

VTA2
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CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
HINT:
S ThisElectricalThrottleControlSystem(ETCS)doesnotusea throttlecable.
S This throttlepositionsensor isanon −contact type.

The throttle position sensor is mounted on the throttle body and it detects the opening angle of the throttle
valve.Thissensor iselectronicallycontrolledandusesHall −effectelements, so thataccuratecontroland
reliabilitycanbeobtained.The throttlepositionsensorhas2sensorelements / signaloutputs:VTA 1 and
VTA2.VTA 1 used todetect the throttleopeningangleandVTA2 isused todetectmalfunctions inVTA 1.Volt-
ageapplied toVTA 1 andVTA2changebetween0Vand5V inproportion to theopeningangleof the throttle
valve. There are several checks that the engine control ECU performs to confirm proper operation of the
throttlepositionsensorandVTA 1.
The engine control ECU judges the current opening angle of the throttle valve from these signals input from
terminalsVTA 1 andVTA2,and theenginecontrolECUcontrols the throttlemotor tomake the throttlevalve
angle properly in response to driver inputs.
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DTC No. DTC Detection Condition

Condition (a)ofDTCP0 120,P0 122,P0 123,P0220,P0222orP0223continues
for 2 sec.
(Open or short in the throttle control motor and sensor circuit)

Trouble Area

P0120/41

Detectionconditions forDTCsP0 122andP0 123arenotsatis-
fied but condition (a) is satisfied
(a)VTA 1 is ”0.2Vor less”orVTA 1 is ”4.8Vormore”

(1 tripdetection logic)

SThrottlecontrolmotorandsensor
SEnginecontrolECU

P0122/41
(a)VTA 1 is0.2Vor less

(1 tripdetection logic)

SThrottlecontrolmotorandsensor
SShort inVTA 1 circuit
SOpen inVCcircuit
SEnginecontrolECU

P0123/41
(a)VTA 1 is4.8Vormore

(1 tripdetection logic)

SThrottlecontrolmotorandsensor
SOpen inVTA 1 circuit
SOpen inE2circuit
SVCandVTA 1 circuitareshort −circuited
SEnginecontrolECU

P0220/41

Detection conditions for DTCs P0222 and P0223 are not satis-
fied but condition (a) is satisfied
(a)VTA2 is ”0.5Vor less”orVTA2 is ”4.8Vormore”and

VTA1 is ”0.2Vormore”andVTA 1 is ” 1.8Vor less”
(1 tripdetection logic)

SThrottlecontrolmotorandsensor
SEnginecontrolECU

P0222/41
(a) VTA2 is 0.5 V or less

(1 tripdetection logic)

SThrottlecontrolmotorandsensor
SShort inVTA2circuit
SOpen inVCcircuit
SEnginecontrolECU

P0223/41
(a) VTA2 is ”4.8 V or more” and

VTA1 is ”0.2Vormore”andVTA 1 is ” 1.8Vor less”
(1 tripdetection logic)

SThrottlecontrolmotorandsensor
SOpen inVTA2circuit
SOpen inE2circuit

SVCandVTA2circuitareshort −circuited
SEnginecontrolECU

P2135/41

Condition (a) continues for 0.5 sec. or more, or
condition (b) continues for 0.4 sec. or more:
(a)DifferencebetweenVTA 1 andVTA2 is0.02Vor less
(b)VTA 1 is ”0.2Vor less”andVTA2 is ”0.5Vor less”

(1 tripdetection logic)

SVTA1 andVTA2circuitareshort −circuited
SThrottlecontrolmotorandsensor
SEnginecontrolECU

HINT:
S AfterconfirmingDTCs,use thehand −held tester toconfirm the throttlevalveopeningpercentageand

closed throttle position switch condition.
S THROTTLEPOSmeansVTA 1 signalaswell as theTHROTTLEPOS#2 for theVTA2signal.

Reference (Normal condition):

Tester display Accelerator pedal fully released Accelerator pedal fully depressed

THROTTLE POS 10 to 24 % 66 to 98%

THROTTLE POS #2 2.1 to3. 1 V 4.5 to 5.0 V
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MONITOR DESCRIPTION
The engine control ECU uses throttle position sensor to monitor the throttle valve opening angle.
(a)There isaspecificvoltagedifferenceexpectedbetweenVTA 1 andVTA2foreach throttleopening

angle.
S If thedifferencebetweenVTA 1 andVTA2 is incorrect theenginecontrolECUinterprets thisasa fault

and will set a DTC.
(b)VTA 1 andVTA2eachhaveaspecificvoltageoperating range.
S IfVTA 1 orVTA2 isoutof thenormaloperating range theenginecontrolECUinterprets thisasa fault

and will set a DTC.
(c)VTA 1 andVTA2shouldneverbeclose to thesamevoltage levels.
S IfVTA 1 iswithin0.02VofVTA2 theenginecontrolECUinterprets thisasashort circuit in the throttle

position sensor system and will set a DTC.
This monitor runs for 2 seconds (for first 2 seconds of engine idle) after the engine started.

FAIL SAFE
If the ETCS (Electronic Throttle Control System) has a malfunction, the engine control ECU cuts off current
to the throttle control motor. The throttle control valve returns to a predetermined opening angle (approxi-
mately 16˚ )by the forceof the returnspring.TheenginecontrolECUthenadjusts theengineoutputbycon-
trolling the fuel infection (intermittent fuel −cut)and ignition timing inaccordancewith theacceleratorpedal
opening angle to enable the vehicle to continue at a minimum speed.
If the accelerator pedal is depressed firmly and slowly, the vehicle can be driven slowly.
If a ”pass”condition isdetectedand then the ignitionswitch is turnedOFF, the fail −safeoperationwill stop
and the system will return to normal condition.

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
S If DTCs related to different system that have terminal E2 as the ground terminal are output simulta-

neously, terminal E2 may have an open circuit.
S Read freeze frame data using the hand−held tester. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions

when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the
vehicle was running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, if the air−fuel ratio was lean or
rich, as well as other data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

Hand−held tester:

1 Connect hand−held tester, and read the voltage for throttle position sensor data.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand−held tester main switch ON.
(c) Enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / THROTTLE POS and

THROTTLE POS #2.
CHECK:
Read voltage value displayed on the hand−held tester.
OK:
RESULT:

Throttle position expressed as percentage and voltage

Accelerator pedal released Accelerator pedal depressed
Trouble area Proceed to

THROTTLE POS
(VTA1)

THROTTLE POS #2
(VTA2)

THROTTLE POS
(VTA1)

THROTTLE POS #2
(VTA2)

Trouble area Proceed to

0 % 0 to 0.2 V 0 % 0 to 0.2 V VC circuit open

100 % 4.5 to 5.0 V 100 % 4.5 to 5.0 V E2 circuit open

0 % or 100 %
2.1 to 3.1 V
(Fail safe)

0 % or 100 %
2.1 to 3.1 V
(Fail safe)

VTA1 circuit open or
ground short

A

about 16 %
(Fail safe)

0 to 0.2 or 4.5 to 5.0 V
about 16 %
(Fail safe)

0 to 0.2 or 4.5 to 5.0 V
VTA2 circuit open or

ground short

10 to 24 % 2.15 to 3.05 V
64 to 96 %

(Does not fail safe)
4.5 to 5.0 V

(Does not fail safe)
Throttle position sen-
sor circuit is normal

B

B Go to step 5.

A
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2 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine control ECU
and throttle position sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the T23 throttle control motor and sensor con-

nector.
(b) Disconnect the E7 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:
Check the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

VC (T23−5) − VC (E7−18)

VTA (T23−6) − VTA1 (E7−21)
B l 1 �

VTA2 (T23−4) − VTA2 (E7−31)
Below 1 �

E2 (T23−3) − E2 (E7−28)

VC (T23−5) or VC (E7−18) −
Body ground

VTA (T23−6) or VTA1 (E7−21) −
Body ground 10 k� or higher

VTA2 (T23−4) or VTA2 (E7−31) −
Body ground

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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3 Check voltage between terminals VC and E2 of engine control ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the T23 throttle control motor and sensor con-

nector.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between the specified terminals of the E7
engine control ECU connector.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

VC (E7−18) − E2 (E7−28) 4.5 to 5.5 V

NG Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI−74).

OK

4 Replace throttle body (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−42).

Go
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5 Check if DTC output recur.

PREPARATION:
(a) Clear the DTC (See page DI−3) .
(b) Start the engine.
(c) Run the engine at idle for 15 seconds or more.
CHECK:
Read the DTC (See page DI−3) .
RESULT:

Display (DTC Output) Proceed to

”P0120, P0122, P0123, P0220, P0222, P0223 and/or P2135” are output
again

A

No DTC output B

B System is OK.

A

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI−74).
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When not using hand−held tester:

1 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine control ECU
and throttle position sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the T23 throttle control motor and sensor con-

nector.
(b) Disconnect the E7 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:
Check the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

VC (T23−5) − VC (E7−18)

VTA (T23−6) − VTA1 (E7−21)
B l 1 �

VTA2 (T23−4) − VTA2 (E7−31)
Below 1 �

E2 (T23−3) − E2 (E7−28)

VC (T23−5) or VC (E7−18) −
Body ground

VTA (T23−6) or VTA1 (E7−21) −
Body ground 10 k� or higher

VTA2 (T23−4) or VTA2 (E7−31) −
Body ground

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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2 Check voltage between terminals VC and E2 of engine control ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the T23 throttle control motor and sensor con-

nector.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between the specified terminals of the E7
engine control ECU connector.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

VC (E7−18) − E2 (E7−28) 4.5 to 5.5 V

NG Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI−74).

OK

3 Replace throttle body (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−42).

Go
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4 Check if DTC output recur.

PREPARATION:
(a) Clear the DTC (See page DI−3) .
(b) Start the engine.
(c) Run the engine at idle for 15 seconds or more.
CHECK:
Read the DTC (See page DI−3) .
RESULT:

Display (DTC Output) Proceed to

”P0120, P0122, P0123, P0220, P0222, P0223 and/or P2135” are output
again

A

No DTC output B

B System is OK.

A

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI−74).


